Utah statutes.
35A-1-205.   Workforce Appeals Board -- Chair -- Appointment -- Compensation
-- Qualifications.
(1)  There is created the Workforce Appeals Board within the department
consisting of one or more panels to hear and decide appeals from the decision
of an administrative law judge.
(2) (a)  A panel shall consist of three impartial members appointed by the
governor as follows:
(i)  the board chair, appointed in accordance with Subsection (5);
(ii)  one member appointed to represent employers; and  in making this
appointment, the governor shall consider nominations from employer
organizations; and
(iii)  one member appointed to represent employees; and in making this
appointment, the governor shall consider nominations from employee
organizations.
(b)  No more than two members of a panel may belong to the same political
party.
(3) (a) (i)  The term of a member shall be six years beginning on March 1 of
the year the member is appointed, except as otherwise provided in Subsection
(3)(a)(ii).
(ii)  The governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust
the length of terms to ensure that the terms of members are staggered so that
approximately one third of the members are appointed every two years.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(c)  The governor may remove a member for inefficiency, neglect of duty,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or other good and sufficient cause.
(d)  A member shall hold office until a successor is appointed and has
qualified.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), a member of the board may
not receive compensation for the member's services, but may receive per diem
and expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at
the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(b)  A member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for the member's
service.
(c)  The member appointed as board chair in accordance with Subsection (5)
shall be compensated at an hourly rate determined by the Department of Human
Resource Management in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State
Personnel Management Act.
(5) (a)  The chief officer of the board shall be the chair, who shall serve as
the executive and administrative head of the board.
(b)  The chair shall be appointed by the governor to represent the public and
may be removed from that position at the will of the governor.
(c)  The chair shall be experienced in administration and possess any
additional qualifications determined by the governor.
(6) (a)  The chair shall designate an alternate from a panel appointed under
this section:
(i)  in the absence of a regular member or the chair; or
(ii)  if the regular member or the chair has a conflict of interest.
(b)  Each case shall be decided by a full three-member panel.
(7)  The department shall provide the Workforce Appeals Board necessary staff
support, except, the board may employ, retain, or appoint legal counsel.
